Arkansas, session 2025, HB1767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of Emergency Medical Services
Advisory Council.
(a)(1) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council is abolished,
and its authority, duties, and functions are transferred to the Emergency
Medical Services Advisory Committee of the Department of Health.
(2) All administrative functions, including the functions of
budgeting or purchasing, records, contracts, personnel, property, and
unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds shall
remain with the Department of Health.
(b)(1) The abolishment of the Emergency Medical Services Advisory
Council does not affect the orders, rules, directives, registration,
*LGL044*
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
licensing, or standards made or promulgated by the Emergency Medical Services
Advisory Council and the State Board of Health or the Department of Health at
the recommendation of the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council before
the effective date of this act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or
standards of the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council and the State
Board of Health or the Department of Health at the recommendation of the
Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council shall continue to be in effect
until they are amended or repealed under authority given by law.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-43-601(b)(1), concerning municipal
affairs delineated, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Matters of public health that concern emergency medical
services, emergency medical technicians services personnel, and ambulances,
as defined in §§ 20-13-201 — 20-13-209 and 20-13-211 the Emergency Medical
Services Act, § 20-13-201 et seq., and ambulance companies, shall be included
in the term “municipal affairs”.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-266-102(a)(2), concerning legislative
determination under the Ambulance Licensing Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) In addition, it is legislatively determined that, in order to
accomplish the purposes enumerated in this chapter, it may also be necessary
for the cities and counties, in addition to all other powers granted in this
chapter, to enact and establish standards, rules, and regulations that are
equal to, or greater than, the minimum standards and rules established by the
state, pursuant to §§ 20-13-201 — 20-13-209 and 20-13-211 the Emergency
Medical Services Act, § 20-13-201 et seq., concerning emergency medical
services, emergency medical technicians, ambulances, ambulance companies,
their relative properties, facilities, equipment, personnel, and all aspects
attendant to providing emergency medical services and ambulance operations
within the boundaries of their respective cities or in respect to the
unincorporated areas of the county.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 14-266-105(a)(1)(A), concerning the grant
of authority to cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
counties under the Ambulance Licensing Act, is amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) Enact and establish standards, rules, and regulations that
are equal to or greater than those established by the state concerning
emergency medical services and emergency medical services personnel,
emergency and nonemergency ambulances, and ambulance companies, as defined
under §§ 20-13-201 — 20-13-209 and 20-13-211 the Emergency Medical Services
Act, § 20-13-201 et seq.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1078 is amended to read as follows:
19-5-1078. EMS Enhancement Revolving Fund.
(a)(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “EMS Enhancement Revolving Fund”.
(2) The EMS Enhancement Revolving Fund shall consist of such
revenue as may be provided by law.
(b) Any funds remaining in the EMS Enhancement Revolving Fund at the
end of the fiscal year shall be made available for distribution as follows:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) of the funds shall be available for
distribution to the eligible state-licensed emergency medical services
through a grant program managed by the Division of Emergency Medical Services
of the Department of Health pursuant to § 20-13-103;
(2) Ten percent (10%) of the funds shall be authorized for use
by the division department for administering the grant program prescribed in
§ 20-13-103, as well as for training, education, equipment, and supplies as
needed to maintain staff proficiency in emergency medical services and
testing support;
(3)(A) Five percent (5%) of the funds shall be authorized for
the purposes of upgrading or instituting educational training sites and the
increased availability of emergency medical services training programs.
(B) The training sites must meet the certification
standards of the division department;
(4)(A) Ten percent (10%) of the funds shall be authorized for
the purpose of instituting special projects managed by the division
department that are directed toward the improvement of emergency medical
services and the presentation of specialized training programs.
(B) Such programs or projects shall meet the standards set
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
forth in the United States Department of Transportation's National Standard
Curriculum of 1998 for Emergency Medical Technician training and approved by
the division department;
(5) Twenty percent (20%) of the funds shall be authorized for
the purpose of instituting and maintaining a trauma system and trauma
registry; and
(6) Five percent (5%) of the funds shall be authorized for use
by the division department for:
(A) Maintaining quality emergency medical services; and
(B) Ensuring public safety and proper medical care by
inspecting and licensing ambulance services and registering emergency medical
services vehicles.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 20-13-101(c), concerning the Emergency
Medical Services Revolving Fund Act, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) It shall be the responsibility of the Division of Emergency
Medical Services Department of Health to promulgate all rules for making
application for the matching funds.
(2) It shall be the further responsibility of the Department of
Health department to review all applications and approve those that shall be
eligible for moneys under the provisions of this section and as may otherwise
be provided by law.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 20-13-101(e), concerning the Emergency
Medical Services Revolving Fund Act, is amended to read as follows:
(e) All moneys deposited into this fund pursuant to § 20-13-211 shall
be used by the department for the following purposes:
(1) Certification Licensure processing for emergency medical
technicians;
(2) Travel expenses related to the onsite administration of
practical and written examinations of emergency medical technicians;
(3) Maintenance of the emergency medical technician certification
licensure software program;
(4) Educational programs for emergency medical technicians;
(5) Continuing maintenance of the required EMT-Instructor
certification for agency personnel; and
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
(6) Other purposes consistent with this section.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 20-13-103 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-103. Grant requests — Division and use of funds.
(a) Grant requests for funds from the EMS Enhancement Revolving Fund
shall be reviewed by the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council
specified in § 20-13-2015 Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee and
recommendations for recipients of grant funds made to the Division of
Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health.
(b)(1) The grant funds shall be evenly divided between the public,
private, and volunteer sectors.
(2) For the purposes of this subsection, the public sector shall
include only those applicants having paid employees.
(c) The grant funds may be used to purchase or fund:
(1)(A) Ambulances for use in providing emergency medical
services to the residents of Arkansas.
(B) Ambulances purchased with these funds shall meet the
standards for and be registered at the I-A level advanced emergency medical
technician or a higher level by the division department;
(2)(A) Rescue vehicles for use in providing advanced life
support or basic life support emergency care.
(B) Any vehicle purchased for advanced life support shall
meet the standards for and be registered at the advanced rescue level by the
division department;
(3) Equipment required on ambulances or required to provide
advanced life support or basic life support rescue services;
(4)(A) Training that leads to Arkansas licensure as emergency
medical services personnel at the basic or advanced levels.
(B) Failure to obtain licensure shall result in the
repayment of funds by the grantee; or
(5) Emergency medical services-related training approved by the
division department.
(d)(1) The funds may only be used to improve services by increasing
the capability and skills of emergency medical services.
(2) Funds may not be used to maintain present status, pay
salaries or daily operating expenses, contract for services, or purchase real
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
property.
(e) The funds may not be used for new services at a lower level than
an existing licensed service which has been in operation for more than one
(1) year in the service area.
(f)(1) All property purchased with the funds shall be returned to the
division department if the licensed ambulance service ceases operations.
(2) The division department shall make every effort to
redistribute returned property and supplies to the replacement service or
other eligible existing services within the same county.
(3) Should no eligible service exist or another eligible service
not be established in the county within one (l) year, all purchases shall be
redistributed by the division department as needed.
(g)(1) Any vehicle or equipment purchased with these funds shall be
used for its intended purpose for at least three (3) years from its date of
purchase.
(2) Vehicles or equipment damaged or worn out within the three-
year period shall be replaced with a like or better item at the grantee's
expense.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 20-13-202(10), concerning definitions
pertaining to emergency medical services, is amended to read as follows:
(10) “Licensure” means official acknowledgment by the department
that an individual has demonstrated competence to perform the emergency
medical services required for licensure under the rules and standards adopted
by the board upon recommendation by the Emergency Medical Services Advisory
Council;

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 20-13-205 is repealed.
20-13-205. Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council — Creation
— Members.
(a) There is created the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council,
which shall consist of nineteen (19) members with a demonstrated interest in
emergency medical services, to be appointed by the Governor as follows:
(1) Four (4) members shall be licensed medical doctors of good
professional standing. One (1) member shall be appointed representing each of
the following areas:
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
(A) The Arkansas Chapter of the American College of
Emergency Physicians;
(B) The Arkansas Academy of Family Physicians, Inc.;
(C) The Arkansas Medical Society, Inc.; and
(D) The medical director for a licensed paramedic
ambulance service;
(2) One (1) member recommended by the Arkansas Hospital
Association, Inc.;
(3) One (1) member who shall be a member of the Arkansas
Emergency Nurses Association;
(4) One (1) member who shall be a member of, and recommended by,
the Arkansas Ambulance Association;
(5) One (1) member who shall be a licensed paramedic;
(6) One (1) member who shall be a licensed EMT;
(7) One (1) member representing fire department-based ambulance
services;
(8) One (1) member representing emergency medical services
personnel training sites who has had at least five (5) years' experience
associated with emergency medical services personnel in this state;
(9) One (1) member who shall be a consumer representative who
has an interest in public health and emergency medical services. The member
shall be appointed by the Governor from the state at large;
(10) One (1) member who shall be sixty-five (65) years of age or
more. This member shall be appointed by the Governor from the state at large
and shall not belong to any other group specifically addressed in this
section, with the exception of the consumer representative;
(11) One (1) member who shall represent city-based or county-
based ambulance services;
(12) One (1) member who shall represent the Arkansas Association
of Chiefs of Police or the Arkansas Sheriffs' Association;
(13) One (1) member representing fire service rescue operations
which do not transport patients;
(14) One (1) member licensed as an attorney at law in good
professional standing within this state and having a knowledge of medical and
legal issues;
(15) One (1) member appointed from a list of two (2) nominees
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
submitted by the Arkansas Emergency Medical Technicians Association; and
(16) One (1) member who shall be a certified military emergency
medical technician.
(b) Members shall be appointed for terms of five (5) years.
(c) Vacancies on the council due to death, resignation, or other
causes shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired
portion of the term thereof in the same manner as is provided in this section
for initial appointments.
(d) Members except those employed by the state may receive expense
reimbursement and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.
(e) The members may be removed by the Governor for neglect of duty or
malfeasance in office.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 20-13-206 is repealed.
20-13-206. Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council — Proceedings.
(a) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council, within thirty
(30) days after its appointment, shall organize as necessary to carry out its
purposes as prescribed by this subchapter.
(b) Procedures adopted, amended, or repealed by the council shall
require a majority vote of all council members.
(c)(1) At the initial organizational meeting of the council, the
members shall elect from among their number a chair and a vice chair to serve
for one (1) year.
(2) Annually thereafter, an organizational meeting shall be held
to elect the officers.
(3) The Director of the Division of Emergency Medical Services
shall serve as the Executive Secretary of the Emergency Medical Services
Advisory Council.
(4) Seven (7) council members shall constitute a quorum.
(d) Quarterly meetings of the council may be held. Special meetings
may be called as provided by the rules of the council.
(e)(1) The Executive Secretary of the Emergency Medical Services
Advisory Council shall keep full and true records of all council proceedings
and preserve all books, documents, and papers relating to the business of the
council.
(2) The records of the council shall be open for inspection at
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
all reasonable times.
(f)(1) The council shall report in writing to the Secretary of the
Department of Health on or about July 31 of each year.
(2) The report shall contain a summary of the proceedings of the
council during the preceding fiscal year, a detailed and itemized statement
of all revenue and of all expenditures made by or in behalf of the council,
other information deemed necessary or useful, and any additional information
which may be requested by the Secretary of the Department of Health.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 20-13-207 is repealed.
20-13-207. Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council — Powers and
duties.
(a) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council shall recommend
for adoption by the State Board of Health rules on all matters relating to
emergency medical services, including without limitation:
(1) Standards for licensure of ambulance and advanced life
support rescue personnel;
(2) Standards for equipment required on ambulance and advanced
life support rescue vehicles;
(3) Standards for vehicles used in patient transportation and
advanced life support rescue response, including communications requirements;
(4) A statewide communications system for emergency medical
services;
(5) Operational standards for providers of ambulance and
advanced life support rescue services, including reporting requirements and
standards for air ambulance and air ambulance services; and
(6) Procedures for summoning and dispatching aid.
(b) The Department of Health shall have evidence that the standards
imposed are important to the quality of patient care.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 20-13-208 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-208. State Board of Health — Powers and duties.
(a)(1) The State Board of Health shall have the responsibility and
authority to hold public hearings and promulgate and implement rules and
standards which that it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this
subchapter upon recommendation by the Emergency Medical Services Advisory
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
Committee.
(2) However, before implementing any rules or standards, the
board shall submit and obtain the review of the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees.
(b) In addition, the board may establish appropriate rules and
standards defining or limiting the emergency medical procedures or services
that may be rendered by licensed emergency medical services personnel who are
authorized to legally perform these services under the conditions set forth
by the board, except that before implementing any rules and standards, the
board shall submit and obtain the review of the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees.
(c) All rules and standards promulgated under this section shall be
adopted in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-
15-201 et seq.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 20-13-210 is repealed.
20-13-210. Rules and standards — Review required.
(a)(1) All rules and standards relating to emergency medical services
promulgated and adopted by the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council
and the State Board of Health or any other state agency or department
authorized to promulgate and adopt rules to carry out this subchapter shall
be submitted to the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate
subcommittees thereof for consideration before being placed in effect by the
department or agency.
(2) No rules or standards promulgated to carry out this
subchapter shall be enforced by any state agency or department until they
have been:
(A) Submitted to and considered by the House Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor; and
(B) Reviewed and approved by the Legislative Council under
§ 10-3-309.
(b) Rules promulgated by the Emergency Medical Services Advisory
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
Council shall receive approval of the Governor after he or she receives the
review and approval of the Legislative Council before effect and enforcement.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 20-13-215(a), concerning the award of a
flag upon the death of a member of emergency medical services personnel, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) When a person licensed by the Division of Emergency Medical
Services Department of Health dies in the course of employment, in
recognition of and appreciation for the service of the deceased person, the
Department of Health department, upon recommendation by the Emergency Medical
Services Advisory Committee, may award one (1) United States flag to the
deceased person's spouse or family.

SECTION 16. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 20-13-218(c),
concerning standards for communication between emergency medical services
personnel and patients regarding specific health conditions, is amended to
read as follows:
(c) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council Emergency Medical
Services Advisory Committee shall establish standards for:

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 13, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
20-13-220. Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee — Creation —
Members.
(a) There is created the Emergency Medical Services Advisory
Committee, which shall consist of eleven (11) with a demonstrated interest in
emergency medical services, to be appointed by the State Board of Health as
follows:
(1) One (1) member who is an emergency medical services medical
director of a ground ambulance service;
(2) One (1) member who is an emergency physician certified by
the Arkansas State Medical Board with emergency room or critical care
experience;
(3) One (1) member from the state at large who is a consumer
representative who has an interest in public health and emergency medical
services;
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
(4)(A) One (1) member who is an emergency medical services
paramedic from a ground transportation provider.
(B) The State Board of Health shall consult The Arkansas
Ambulance Association before making an appointment under subdivision
(a)(4)(A) of this section;
(5)(A) One (1) member from the state at large who is an
emergency medical services clinician working as an emergency medical
technician, an advanced emergency medical technician, a paramedic, or a
community paramedic.
(B) The State Board of Health shall consult the AEMTA Air
Medical Society before making an appointment under subdivision (a)(5)(A) of
this section;
(6)(A) One (1) member who is an air medical services paramedic.
(B) The State Board of Health shall consult the Air
Medical Society of the Arkansas Emergency Medical Technicians Association
before making an appointment under subdivision (a)(6)(A) of this section;
(7)(A) One (1) member who is a public or government licensed
ambulance service provider and a licensed emergency medical services
clinician.
(B) The State Board of Health shall consult The Arkansas
Ambulance Association before making an appointment under subdivision
(a)(7)(A) of this section;
(8)(A) One (1) member who is a private licensed ambulance
service provider and a licensed emergency medical services clinician.
(B) The State Board of Health shall consult The Arkansas
Ambulance Association before making an appointment under subdivision
(a)(8)(A) of this section; and
(9) One (1) member who is a certified military emergency medical
technician;
(10) One (1) member who is a fire-based ambulance service
provider; and
(11) One (1) member who is the Emergency Medical Services
Training Site Program Director.
(b)(1) Members shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years.
(2) Members shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(c) When a member's term ends, the member shall hold office until his
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
or her successor is appointed and qualified.
(d) Vacancies on the committee due to death, resignation, or other
causes shall be filled by appointment by the State Board of Health for the
unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as is provided in this
section for initial appointments.
(e) The members of the committee shall serve without pay but may
receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et
seq.
(f) The members of the committee may be removed by the State Board of
Health for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office.
(g) Members who are appointed as employee members under subsection (a)
of this section shall be active employees in their represented field.

20-13-221. Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee —
Proceedings.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Health shall call the first
meeting of the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee, which shall
occur within thirty (30) days after the appointment of the committee to
organize as necessary to carry out the purposes of the committee as
prescribed by this subchapter.
(b) Procedures adopted, amended, or repealed by the committee shall
require a majority vote of a quorum.
(c)(1) At the initial organizational meeting of the committee, the
members shall elect from among their number a chair and a vice chair to serve
for one (1) year.
(2) Annually thereafter, an organizational meeting of the
committee shall be held to elect the committee officers.
(3) The Secretary of the Department of Health or his or her
designee shall serve as the Executive Secretary of the Emergency Medical
Services Advisory Committee.
(4) Six (6) committee members shall constitute a quorum.
(d)(1) Quarterly meetings of the committee shall be held.
(2) Special meetings shall be called as provided by the rules of
the committee.
(e)(1) The Executive Secretary of the Emergency Medical Services
Advisory Committee shall keep full and true records of all committee
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
proceedings and preserve all books, documents, and papers relating to the
business of the committee.
(2) The records of the committee shall be open for inspection at
all reasonable times.

20-13-222. Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee — Powers and
duties.
(a) In addition to the other duties set forth in this chapter, the
Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee shall:
(1) Make recommendations for rules to be adopted by the State
Board of Health on all matters relating to emergency medical services,
including without limitation:
(A) Standards for licensure of ambulance and advanced life
support rescue personnel;
(B) Standards for equipment required on ambulance and
advanced life support rescue vehicles;
(C) Standards for vehicles used in patient transportation
and advanced life support rescue response, including without limitation
communications requirements;
(D) A statewide communications system for emergency
medical services;
(E) Operational standards for providers of ambulance and
advanced life support rescue services, including without limitation reporting
requirements and standards for air ambulances and air ambulance services; and
(F) Procedures for summoning and dispatching aid;
(2) Assist area health planning in the establishment and
operation of local, municipal, county, or district emergency medical
services;
(3) Hold public administrative hearings for disciplinary action
against emergency medical services personnel or an emergency medical services
provider as defined under § 20-13-202;
(4) Hear appeals for the denial or renewal of licensure of
emergency medical services personnel or emergency medical services providers
as defined under § 20-13-202;
(5) Review requests for waiver of criminal background
disqualifying offenses under § 20-13-1106; and
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
(6)(A) Engage in the development of dispatching capabilities for
emergency medical services in the state.
(B) An emergency medical services provider shall make a
reasonable effort to see that a patient is taken to a physician or hospital
of the patient's choice, if within a reasonable distance.
(b) An appeal of an adverse action taken by the Emergency Medical
Services Advisory Committee under subdivisions (a)(3) and (4) of this section
may be made to the State Board of Health and then the appropriate circuit
court in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-
201 et seq.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 20-13-807(b)(5), concerning the membership
of the Trauma Advisory Council, is amended to read as follows:
(5) One (1) member appointed by the Governor after consulting
the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council Emergency Medical Services
Advisory Committee;

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 20-13-901(4), concerning definitions
pertaining to the Arkansas Emergency Medical Services Do Not Resuscitate Act,
is amended to read as follows:
(4) “Emergency Medical Services Do Not Resuscitate Protocol”
means a standardized method of procedure, approved recommended by the State
Board of Health Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee and adopted in
the rules of the department State Board of Health, for the withholding of
emergency life-sustaining procedures by emergency medical services personnel;

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 20-13-906 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-906. Rulemaking authority.
(a) Upon the adoption of an Emergency Medical Services Do Not
Resuscitate Protocol by the State Board of Health at the recommendation of
the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee, the Department of Health
may adopt a standard form of Do Not Resuscitate Identification to be used
statewide.
(b) The department State Board of Health shall may adopt rules
recommended by the committee to administer the provisions of this subchapter.

03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1002 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-1002. License application and renewal.
(a)(1) An application for the issuance or renewal of an ambulance
service license or a provisional ambulance service license shall be made on
forms provided by the Department of Health and shall be accompanied by any
fee as required by law or by rules promulgated by the department State Board
of Health.
(2) Each license shall be renewed annually.
(b) Each licensee shall be issued a service license in one (1) of the
classifications set forth by the department.
(c) The department board shall promulgate rules for the licensure and
renewal of an ambulance service license.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1005 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-1005. Revocation of license.
Three (3) formal citations during the license term for failure to
comply with this subchapter and any rules promulgated by the Department of
Health State Board of Health in regard to ambulance services shall result in
revocation of the ambulance service license.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1101(9), concerning definitions
pertaining to criminal records checks for emergency medical services
personnel, is amended to read as follows:
(9) “Licensure” means the official acknowledgment by the
department that an individual has demonstrated competence to perform the
emergency medical services required for licensure under the rules and
standards adopted by the State Board of Health upon recommendation by the
Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council Emergency Medical Services
Advisory Committee;

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1101(11), concerning definitions
pertaining to criminal records checks for emergency medical services
personnel, is amended to read as follows:
(11) “Relicensure” means the official acknowledgment by the
Division of Emergency Medical Services department that an individual has
demonstrated competence to perform the emergency medical services required
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
for relicensure under Arkansas EMS Rules Rules for Emergency Medical
Services, 20 CAR pt. 81;

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1102(b), concerning mandatory
criminal history checks for emergency medical services personnel, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) The Division of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of
Health shall conduct a state or national criminal history check, or both, on
the applicant and determine whether the applicant is disqualified from
licensure based on the report of the applicant's criminal history and forward
its determination to the applicant directly.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1105 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-1105. Response — File copies.
The Division of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health
shall maintain on file for a period of three (3) years, subject to inspection
by the Arkansas Crime Information Center or the Identification Bureau of the
Division of Arkansas State Police, a copy of each criminal history check
completed by all applicants requesting state licensure.

SECTION 27. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 20-13-
1106(a)(1), concerning disqualifying offenses for emergency medical services
certification, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the
Division of Emergency Medical Services Department of Health shall issue a
determination that a person is disqualified from certification or
recertification if the person has been found guilty of or has pleaded guilty
or nolo contendere in a state court, inside or outside of this state, or a
federal court, to any of the following offenses or similar conduct under
another jurisdiction, including offenses for which the record has been
expunged:

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1106(a)(2), concerning disqualifying
offenses for emergency medical services certification, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) However, the division department shall forward a request
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
for a waiver to the Secretary of the Department of Health Emergency Medical
Services Advisory Committee for review on all applicants who have been
convicted of the crimes in subdivision (a)(1) of this section if five (5)
years have passed since the conviction, if five (5) years have passed since
release from custodial confinement, or if the applicants are currently
certified licensed emergency medical services personnel, prior to making the
final determination on certification or recertification.
(B) Individuals under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this
section shall not be suspended prior to the secretary's committee's making
the final determination.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1106(b)(2), concerning disqualifying
offenses for emergency medical services certification, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) Was not committed while performing duties as a member of
emergency medical services personnel.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1106(c)(1) and (2), concerning
disqualifying offenses for emergency medical services certification, is
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The provisions of this section may be waived by the Department
of Health committee upon written request by the person who is the subject of
the criminal history check.
(2) The written request for waiver shall be mailed delivered to
the secretary committee in care of the Department of Health within fifteen
(15) calendar days after receipt of the determination by the department.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1107(b), concerning the procedure to
challenge a criminal history check, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The Division of Emergency Medical Services Emergency Medical
Services Advisory Committee shall follow the established procedures for
applicants to challenge determinations in accordance with the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., as stated in the current
EMS Rules Rules for Emergency Medical Services, 20 CAR pt. 81.

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1108 is amended to read as follows:
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
20-13-1108. Additional checks.
The Division of Emergency Medical Services Department of Health
maintains the right to conduct additional criminal history checks at the cost
of the division department on applicants or Arkansas-licensed emergency
medical services personnel under investigation for violation of current
emergency medical services laws or rules.

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1109 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-1109. Report and index — Forms — Database.
(a) The Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police
shall maintain an index of the results of each applicant's criminal history
check.
(b) The Division of Emergency Medical Services Department of Health
shall develop forms that are approved by the bureau to be used for criminal
history checks conducted under this subchapter.
(c) The Division of Emergency Services department shall develop and
maintain a database of determinations regarding applicants.

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1111 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-1111. Notice of convictions.
Arkansas-licensed emergency medical services personnel shall notify the
Division of Emergency Medical Services Department of Health of any conviction
of or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any offenses listed in § 20-13-
1106(a) within ten (10) calendar days after the conviction or guilty plea or
plea of nolo contendere.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1112 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-1112. Forms — Rules.
The Arkansas Crime Information Center, the Identification Bureau of the
Division of Arkansas State Police, and the Division of Emergency Medical
Services Department of Health shall cooperate to prepare forms and promulgate
consistent rules as necessary to implement this subchapter.

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1113 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-1113. Confidentiality.
(a) All criminal history checks obtained under this subchapter are
03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1767
confidential and are restricted to the exclusive use of the Arkansas Crime
Information Center, the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas
State Police, the Division of Emergency Medical Services Department of
Health, and the person who is the subject of the report.
(b) The information contained in criminal history checks shall not be
released or otherwise disclosed to any other person or agency except by court
order and is specifically exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., except that the Division of
Emergency Services department shall furnish determinations to qualified
entities.

SECTION 37. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 20-13-
1602(a), concerning community paramedic licensure, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) To be eligible for licensure by the Department of Health under the
Division of Emergency Medical Services as a community paramedic, an
individual shall:

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1603(a), concerning rules for the
community paramedic licensure program, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council and the State
Board of Health shall adopt rules to implement this subchapter.

SECTION 39. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(19), concerning stipend
authorizations for certain state boards, is amended to read as follows:
(19) Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council Emergency
Medical Services Advisory Committee;

SECTION 40. Arkansas Code § 25-43-802(a)(34), concerning the state
entities transferred to the Department of Health, is repealed:
(34) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council, created
under § 20-13-205;

/s/L. Johnson


03-19-2025 15:32:35 LGL044